Missouri, session 2026, HB2741.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 302.735, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 302.733 and 302.735, to read as follows:
302.733. 1. An operator of a commercial motor vehicle shall be able to read and
speak the English language sufficiently to:
(1) Converse with the general public;
(2) Understand highway traffic signs and signals in the English language;
(3) Respond to official inquiries; and
(4) Make entries on reports and records.
2. A person commits the offense of operating a commercial motor vehicle
without sufficient English language proficiency if he or she:
(1) Operates a commercial vehicle; and
(2) Fails to demonstrate proficiency in the English language as required under
subsection 1 of this section.
3. The offense of operating a commercial motor vehicle without sufficient
English language proficiency is a class D misdemeanor for a first offense and a class B
misdemeanor for a second or subsequent offense.
4. A driver found to be in violation of the language proficiency requirements of
this section shall be prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle within this
state until such a time that the driver is able to meet the requirements of subsection 1 of
this section.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2741 2
5. Any operator of a commercial motor vehicle found to be in violation of this
section shall, in addition to the penalties provided under subsections 3 and 4 of this
section, be subject to a fine of one thousand dollars.
6. A commercial motor carrier whose driver is found to be in violation of this
section shall be subject to a fine of three thousand dollars for each violation.
7. A commercial motor carrier shall be notified of the location of any
commercial motor vehicle involved in a violation of this section and, upon payment of a
fine in full and presentation of a driver who meets all of the requirements to operate a
commercial motor vehicle in this state, shall take possession of the vehicle. If the
commercial motor carrier is unable to either pay such fine or present such driver within
twelve hours after notification, the owner of any cargo being transported by the
commercial motor vehicle shall be notified and allowed to arrange for the transfer of the
cargo to another vehicle. Neither the state or the owner of such cargo shall be liable for
any reasonable action to transfer such cargo.
302.735. 1. An application shall not be taken from a nonresident after September 30,
2005. The application for a commercial driver's license shall include, but not be limited to,
the applicant's legal name, mailing and residence address, if different, a physical description
of the person, including sex, height, weight and eye color, the person's Social Security
number, date of birth and any other information deemed appropriate by the director. The
application shall also require, beginning September 30, 2005, the applicant to provide the
names of all states where the applicant has been previously licensed to drive any type of
motor vehicle during the preceding ten years.
2. A commercial driver's license shall expire on the applicant's birthday in the sixth
year after issuance, unless the license must be issued for a shorter period due to other
requirements of law or for transition or staggering of work as determined by the director, and
must be renewed on or before the date of expiration. When a person changes such person's
name an application for a duplicate license shall be made to the director of revenue. When a
person changes such person's mailing address or residence the applicant shall notify the
director of revenue of said change, however, no application for a duplicate license is required.
A commercial license issued pursuant to this section to an applicant less than twenty-one
years of age and seventy years of age and older shall expire on the applicant's birthday in the
third year after issuance, unless the license must be issued for a shorter period as determined
by the director.
3. A commercial driver's license containing a hazardous materials endorsement issued
to an applicant who is between the age of twenty-one and sixty-nine shall not be issued for a
period exceeding five years from the approval date of the security threat assessment as
determined by the Transportation Security Administration.

HCS HB 2741 3
4. The director shall issue a biennial commercial driver's license containing a school
bus endorsement to an applicant who is seventy-five years of age or older. The fee for such
license shall be seven dollars and fifty cents.
5. A commercial driver's license containing a hazardous materials endorsement issued
to an applicant who is seventy years of age or older shall not be issued for a period exceeding
three years. The director shall not require such drivers to obtain a security threat assessment
more frequently than such assessment is required by the Transportation Security
Administration under the Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate
Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act (USA PATRIOT ACT) of 2001.
(1) The state shall immediately revoke a hazardous materials endorsement upon
receipt of an initial determination of threat assessment and immediate revocation from the
Transportation Security Administration as defined by 49 CFR 1572.13(a).
(2) The state shall revoke or deny a hazardous materials endorsement within fifteen
days of receipt of a final determination of threat assessment from the Transportation Security
Administration as required by CFR 1572.13(a).
6. The fee for a commercial driver's license or renewal commercial driver's license
issued for a period greater than three years shall be forty dollars.
7. The fee for a commercial driver's license or renewal commercial driver's license
issued for a period of three years or less shall be twenty dollars.
8. The fee for a duplicate commercial driver's license shall be twenty dollars.
9. In order for the director to properly transition driver's license requirements under
the Motor Carrier Safety Improvement Act of 1999 and the Uniting and Strengthening
America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act
(USA PATRIOT ACT) of 2001, the director is authorized to stagger expiration dates and
make adjustments for any fees, including driver examination fees that are incurred by the
driver as a result of the initial issuance of a transitional license required to comply with such
acts.
10. Within thirty days after moving to this state, the holder of a commercial driver's
license shall apply for a commercial driver's license in this state. The applicant shall meet all
other requirements of sections 302.700 to 302.780, except that the director may waive the
driving test for a commercial driver's license as required in section 302.720 if the applicant
for a commercial driver's license has a valid commercial driver's license from a state which
has requirements for issuance of such license comparable to those in this state.
11. Any person who falsifies any information in an application or test for a
commercial driver's license shall not be licensed to operate a commercial motor vehicle, or
the person's commercial driver's license shall be cancelled, for a period of one year after the
director discovers such falsification.

HCS HB 2741 4
12. Beginning July 1, 2005, the director shall not issue a commercial driver's license
under this section unless the director verifies that the applicant is lawfully present in the
United States before accepting the application. If lawful presence is granted for a temporary
period, no commercial driver's license shall be issued. The director may, by rule or
regulation, establish procedures to verify the lawful presence of the applicant and establish
the duration of any commercial driver's license issued under this section. No rule or portion
of a rule promulgated pursuant to the authority of this section shall become effective unless it
has been promulgated pursuant to chapter 536.
13. (1) Effective December 19, 2005, notwithstanding any provisions of subsections
1 and 5 of this section to the contrary, the director may issue a nondomiciled commercial
driver's license or commercial driver's instruction permit to a resident of a foreign jurisdiction
if the United States Secretary of Transportation has determined that the commercial motor
vehicle testing and licensing standards in the foreign jurisdiction do not meet the testing
standards established in 49 CFR 383.
(2) Any applicant for a nondomiciled commercial driver's license or commercial
driver's instruction permit must present evidence satisfactory to the director that the applicant
currently has employment with an employer in this state. The nondomiciled applicant must
meet the same testing, driver record requirements, conditions, and is subject to the same
disqualification and conviction reporting requirements applicable to resident commercial
drivers.
(3) The nondomiciled commercial driver's license will expire on the same date that
the documents establishing lawful presence for employment expire. The word
"nondomiciled" shall appear on the face of the nondomiciled commercial driver's license.
Any applicant for a Missouri nondomiciled commercial driver's license or commercial
driver's instruction permit must first surrender any nondomiciled commercial driver's license
issued by another state.
(4) The nondomiciled commercial driver's license applicant must pay the same fees as
required for the issuance of a resident commercial driver's license or commercial driver's
instruction permit.
(5) A person holding a nondomiciled commercial driver's license or commercial
driver's instruction permit within this state shall also possess a valid work visa or
provide proof of citizenship to validate his or her identity while operating a commercial
motor vehicle. Proof of citizenship shall be demonstrated through presentation of a
birth certificate, naturalization certificate, or valid passport.
(6) A commercial motor carrier whose driver is found to be in violation of
subdivision (5) of this subsection shall be subject to a fine in the amount of three
thousand dollars for each violation.

HCS HB 2741 5
(7) A driver found to be in violation of subdivision (5) of this subsection shall be
prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle within this state until such a time
100 that the driver is able to meet the requirements of such subdivision. Any driver found to
101 be operating a motor vehicle within this state while under such prohibition shall be
102 guilty of a class B misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be subject to a fine not to
103 exceed one thousand dollars or by imprisonment for not more than ninety days, or by
104 both such fine and imprisonment.
105 (8) The commercial motor carrier shall be notified of the location of any
106 commercial motor vehicle involved in a violation of subdivision (5) of this subsection
107 and, upon payment of the fine in full and presentation of a driver who meets all
108 requirements to operate a commercial motor vehicle within this state, shall take
109 possession of the vehicle. If the commercial motor carrier is unable to either pay such
110 fine or present such driver within twelve hours after notification, the owner of any cargo
111 being transported by the commercial motor vehicle shall be notified and allowed to
112 arrange for the transfer of the cargo to another vehicle. Neither the state or the owner
113 of such cargo shall be liable for any reasonable action to transfer such cargo.
114 14. Foreign jurisdiction for purposes of issuing a nondomiciled commercial driver's
115 license or commercial driver's instruction permit under this section shall not include any of
116 the fifty states of the United States or Canada or Mexico.
✔